Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 3. Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board.

Sec. 19.65.110.
Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board.

There is established in the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, substituted “Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board” for “Alaska Marine Transportation Advisory Board” at the end.

Sec. 19.65.120.
Board composition.

The board is composed of the deputy commissioner of transportation and public facilities assigned to the Alaska marine highway system and the following eight public members, each of whom must be a resident of the state:

one representative, who may be retired, of a recognized union that represents employees of the Alaska marine highway system, appointed by the governor;

one representative of an Alaska Native organization or tribe who is from a community served by the Alaska marine highway system, appointed by the governor;

six public members

who collectively have experience in enterprise, architecture, business operations, financial management, risk management, logistics, supply chain management, engineering, project management and controls, marine operations, strategy, regulatory compliance, ship maintenance, construction, and repair, quality management, continuous improvement, sales, marketing, communications, customer interface, or experience management;

two of whom are appointed by the governor, two of whom are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who serve at the pleasure of the speaker of the house of representatives, and two of whom are appointed by the president of the senate and who serve at the pleasure of the president of the senate.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 20 SLA 2021.]

The members of the board, except for the deputy commissioner of transportation and public facilities, shall serve staggered six-year terms. If a vacancy arises on the board, the governor, the president of the senate, or the speaker of the house of representatives, as applicable, shall, within 30 days after the vacancy arises, appoint a person to serve the balance of the unexpired term. A person appointed to fill the balance of an unexpired term shall serve on the board from the date of appointment until the expiration of the term.

A majority of the membership of the board may remove a member, except for the deputy commissioner of transportation and public facilities, if that member misses more than two meetings in a calendar year and has not been previously excused.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2013; am §§ 4 — 6, 11 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision applicable to the appointment of the initial members of the advisory board established by this section, see § 3, ch. 62, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transitional provision applicable to the expiration of the terms of members of the Alaska Marine Transportation Advisory Board and appointment of the initial members of the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board, see § 12, ch. 20, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “12 members” for “11 members”; in (a)(1)(A), inserted “Gustavus,” following “Juneau,”; in (a)(1)(e), deleted “Homer,” following “False Pass,”, “Kodiak, Port Lions,” following “King Cove,”, and “Seldovia,” following “Sand Point,”; added (a)(1)(F); in (a)(2), substituted “one marine captain or marine engineer with 20 or more years of experience” for “one retired marine captain or marine engineer”; made related changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, rewrote (a); repealed (b); in (c), in the first sentence, inserted “, except for the deputy commissioner of transportation and public facilities,” following “The members of the board”, and substituted “six year terms” for “three year terms”, in the second sentence, inserted “, the president of the senate, or the speaker of the house of representatives, as applicable,” following “the governor”; in (d), deleted “Board members serve at the pleasure of the governor, in addition,” at the beginning, inserted “, except for the deputy commissioner of transportation and public facilities,” following “a member” and made a related change.

Sec. 19.65.130.
Officers and quorum.

The members of the board shall select a chair and a vice-chair from among the members of the board each year. The vice-chair presides over meetings in the absence of the chair. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum. A vacancy in the board does not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.140.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at least four times each year. Meetings may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members of the board. At least one meeting each year must be attended by the board members in person, but all other meetings may be conducted by teleconference. All meetings are open to the public unless an executive session is called based on the criteria in AS

44.62.310(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.150.
Per diem and expenses.

Members of the board do not receive a salary, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.160.
Records.

Records of the board are subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.170.
Legal assistance.

The Department of Law shall provide all legal services for the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.180.
Powers, duties, and functions.

After the commissioner of transportation and public facilities has considered one or more candidates for the position of director or deputy commissioner of the Alaska marine highway system, the commissioner shall confer with the board regarding that candidate or those candidates before making an appointment to that position. The selection of those candidates shall be without regard to political affiliation.

The board may establish volunteer regional advisory committees. The purpose of the advisory committees is to provide recommendations to the board regarding concerns from the region of the members who constitute the advisory committee.

The board may issue reports and recommendations and shall, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, prepare and submit to the department and the governor for review a strategic plan that includes the mission, core values, objectives, initiatives, and performance goals of the Alaska marine highway system.

The board may receive information from the department as the board considers necessary to carry out its duties, and the department shall provide information requested by the board in a timely and responsive manner.

The board shall provide advice and recommendations to the commissioner of transportation and public facilities concerning the operation and management of the Alaska marine highway system, including advice and recommendations regarding business to enhance revenue and reduce costs, personnel management, commercial service options, ship maintenance, construction, and repair, fleet strategy, reliability, and regulatory compliance, and other service objectives.

If the board determines that the Alaska marine highway system has deviated from a plan, policy, or procedure described in the short-term plan or comprehensive long-range plan prepared under AS

19.65.011

, the board may prepare a report recommending corrective action. The board shall submit an electronic report prepared under this subsection to the legislature and the governor and shall make the report available to the public.

The board may establish a task force that includes members who are not members of the board and that is tasked with investigating matters relevant to the Alaska marine highway system and reporting to the board. Members of a task force established under this subsection are not entitled to receive a salary, per diem, or travel expenses.

The board shall annually submit recommendations to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities regarding the preparation of the statewide transportation improvement program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008; am §§ 7, 8 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, in (d), added “, and the department shall provide information requested by the board in a timely and responsive manner” at the end; added (e) – (h).

Sec. 19.65.190.
Staff.

The department shall provide staff for the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008)

Sec. 19.65.195.
Definition.

In AS

19.65.110

—

19.65.195

, “board” means the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2008; am § 9 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, substituted “Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board” for “Alaska Marine Transportation Advisory Board” at the end.